Utah statutes.
20A-11-702.   Campaign financial reporting of political issues expenditures by corporations -- Financial reporting.

(1) (a)  Each corporation that has made political issues expenditures on current or proposed ballot issues that total at least $750 during a calendar year shall file a verified financial statement with the lieutenant governor's office:

(i)  on January 10, reporting expenditures as of December 31 of the previous year;

(ii)  seven days before the regular primary election date;

(iii)  on August 31; and

(iv)  seven days before the regular general election date.

(b)  The corporation shall report:

(i)  a detailed listing of all expenditures made since the last statement; and

(ii)  for financial statements under Subsections (1)(a)(ii) through (iv), expenditures as of five days before the required filing date of the financial statement.

(c)  The corporation need not file a statement under this section if it made no expenditures during the reporting period.

(2)  That statement shall include:

(a)  the name and address of each individual, entity, or group of individuals or entities that received a political issues expenditure of more than $50 from the corporation, and the amount of each political issues expenditure;

(b)  the total amount of political issues expenditures disbursed by the corporation; and

(c) a statement by the corporation's treasurer or chief financial officer certifying the accuracy of the verified financial statement.

